New York, session 2025-2026, A3644.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 28 of subparagraph (i) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 219 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (28) the county of Seneca is hereby further authorized and empowered 5 to adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions imposing such 6 taxes at a rate that is one percent additional to the three percent rate 7 authorized above in this paragraph for such county for the period begin- 8 ning December first, two thousand two and ending November thirtieth, two 9 thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07206-01-5